Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 6

Native Brandy Law

Publisher's Notes.

This chapter contains provisions which exclusively regulate the manufacture, sale, and transportation of native brandy. However, native brandy is also regulated under provisions of this title governing “alcoholic beverages” generally. Consequently, the provisions of this chapter must be read in conjunction with the remainder of the title in order to form a complete picture of the regulatory scheme as it applies to native brandy.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1971, No. 585, § 34: approved Apr. 6, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to establish an orderly procedure which will insure the monthly and quarterly distribution of funds for the necessary services and operations of the state government, as provided for in this act, it is necessary that the provisions of this act become effective immediately; that under the provisions of this act seriously needed improvements for many of our public institutions are contemplated, and only the provisions of this act will provide such funds which will be adequate to alleviate this situation; and that only the provisions of this act will correct many of our financial difficulties, and which otherwise may deprive the citizens of this state from receiving the benefits for which the operation of state government contemplates. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-6-101. Title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Native Brandy Law”.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 163, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-706.

3-6-102. Manufacture and sale authorized.

It shall be lawful for any person under the terms and provisions hereof to manufacture and to sell within the State of Arkansas, and to export without the state, brandy, cordials, or other distillates, or their components, which are made from agricultural or horticultural products such as peaches, apples, cherries, plums, grapes, boysenberries, blackberries, and other fruits produced solely within the state, when such person shall have become qualified to do so under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 163, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-707.

3-6-103. Administration by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or its successor shall have the right to regulate the manufacture and sale of the products authorized in §3-6-102 and shall make reasonable rules governing the manufacture and sale thereof. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, all other laws now in effect governing the manufacture and sale of intoxicating liquors shall be deemed applicable.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 163, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-712; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 84.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the first sentence.

3-6-104. Permits.

(a)

Upon application by any qualified person, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or any successor thereof performing its functions as now defined by law shall issue to the person a manufacturer's permit which shall authorize and permit the person to manufacture and sell, under the terms and provisions hereof, brandy, cordials, or other distillates or component parts thereof manufactured solely from agricultural or horticultural products produced within the State of Arkansas.

(b)

However, no permit shall be granted to any person, firm, or corporation who shall not have been or whose members or all the stockholders thereof shall not have been a citizen and resident maintaining bona fide residence and domicile within the state for a continuous period of five (5) years next preceding the date of making such application.

(c)

A permit application shall be accompanied by a permit fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the issuance of such permit.

(d)

When the permit is issued, it shall be without an expiration date.

(e)

So long as the permit shall remain in full force and effect, the holder shall pay an annual permit fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(f)

The permit shall be cancelled only upon reasonable cause after hearing in the manner now provided by law.

(g)

The permit shall not be transferable.

(h)

The holder of a permit shall be authorized to manufacture the products defined in §3-6-102 and to sell them without the necessity of obtaining any further license or permit to the holders of bona fide wholesale or retail liquor permits issued in the manner now provided by law and may sell the products to the holders of permits to manufacture native wines in this state. Manufacturers shall be authorized to sell such products at retail on the premises of the authorized place of manufacture.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 163, §§ 3-5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-708 — 48-710; Acts 1993, No. 1028, § 1.

Cross References.

Causes for revocation, generally, §3-4-301.

Payment of renewal fees, §3-4-216.

Revocation and suspension proceedings generally, §§3-2-212 —3-2-217.

3-6-105. Tax on sales.

(a)

The holder of a permit shall pay a tax of one dollar ($1.00) per gallon, payable and collectible in the manner as in the case of other taxes on intoxicating liquors now provided on all of the products sold for consumption within the State of Arkansas to the holders of wholesale or retail liquor permits within the state.

(b)

The manufacturer may sell the products for export without the state, or to the manufacturers of native wine in this state for use in the fortification of the wine, free of payment of the taxes, under rules and regulations as may be provided pursuant to the authority of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 163, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-711.

Cross References.

Tax collection procedure, §§3-7-107,3-7-201.

3-6-106. Collection of fees and taxes.

(a)

The permit fees and the tax herein provided shall be collected in the same manner as all other liquor taxes and under such reasonable rules as the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration or his or her successor may provide.

(b)

The permit fees and taxes shall be deposited into the State Treasury as general revenues to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund, there to be allocated to the various funds, fund accounts, and accounts participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each as provided by law and be used for the respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 163, § 8, as added by 1953, No. 118, § 36(A), as added by 1971, No. 585, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-713; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3330.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a).